Louisiana, session 2026, HB889.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:449(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§449. Tags; distribution; use; containers; penalties
* * *
C.(1) All oysters and other molluscan species taken from Louisiana waters
for sale which are sacked or otherwise containerized while in the shell and on board
a fisherman's vessel shall be tagged prior to removal from the vessel. The tag shall
include all information required by the Louisiana Department of Health, office of
public health, and the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries. All oysters and other
molluscan species which are to be sacked or otherwise containerized while in the
shell at dockside shall be containerized and tagged immediately upon arrival at the
dock prior to shipment.
(2) The department shall establish a bulk tagging process to be utilized for
alternative oyster cultivation. The bulk tag may be utilized to represent all oysters
on board the vessel between the harvest area and the dockside facility. The tag shall
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 889 ENROLLED
include all information required by the Louisiana Department of Health, office of
public health, and the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.